src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection

## Temporary lexica

* **LEXICON V_** is for ad-hoc incoming verbs, not in xml

## Auxiliary verbs

* **LEXICON V-NEG** ei:e

* **LEXICON V-PROH** älä:äl

* **LEXICON V_OLLA** olla:o
* **LEXICON V_OLLA_01** olla:o

## Regular verbs

### Verbs ending in a diphthong
The verb has only a vowel stem, which may be either weak or strong.
-ua/-iä, -ie, -UO

* **LEXICON V_KANDUA** kandua:kanda
Back Vowel
* **LEXICON V_KANDUA_01** kandua:kanda
Gradation Yes

* **LEXICON V_OTTUA** ottua:otta
Back Vowel
* **LEXICON V_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01** ottua:otta
Gradation Yes

* **LEXICON V_OTTUA-SG3** ottua:otta

* **LEXICON V_OTTUA-3** ottua:otta

* **LEXICON V_HEITTIÄ** heittä:heittä
Front vowel

* **LEXICON V_HEITTIÄ-SG3** heittä:heittä

* **LEXICON V_HEITTIÄ-3** heittä:tiedä

* **LEXICON V_TIEDIÄ** tiediä:ti
Front vowel
Gradation Yes

* **LEXICON V_PIDIÄ** pidiä:pidä
Gradation Yes
Front vowel
* **LEXICON V_PIDIÄ_01** pidiä:pidä

* **LEXICON V_PIDIÄ-SG3** pidiä:pidä
* **LEXICON V_PIDIÄ-SG3_01** pidiä:pidä

-ua/iä polysyllabic stem

* **LEXICON V_ALENDUA** alendua:alenda
Harmony: Back

* **LEXICON V_ELLENDIÄ** ellendiä:ellendä
Harmony: Front
* **LEXICON V_ALENDUA/ELLENDIÄ_01** ellendiä:ellendä alendua:alenda
Gradation No

* **LEXICON V_LIIKUTTUA** liikuttua:liikutta
Harmony: Back

* **LEXICON V_MENETTIÄ** menettiä:menettä
Harmony: Front
* **LEXICON V_LIIKUTTUA/MENETTIÄ_01** liikuttua:liikutta, menettiä:menettä
Gradation YES

-UO two‑syllable stem

* **LEXICON V_PUNUO** punuo:puno
Back vowel
* **LEXICON V_PUNUO/XX_01** punuo:puno
Gradation split this 2024-08-19
INDPRSSG1, INDPRSSG2, INDPRSPL1, INDPRSPL2, INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK, INDPRTPL3_Ettih,
INDPRTCONNEGPL3_EttU, CONDPRSPL3_EttAs, IMPRT_kkA, PSS-PRSPRC_ttAvU

* **LEXICON V_PUNUO-SG3** punuo:puno

* **LEXICON V_VALUO** valuo:valu
Back vowel
* **LEXICON V_VALUO/PYZYÖ_01** valuo:valu
Gradation No
similar_to: V_PYZYÖ

* **LEXICON V_VALUO-SG3** valuo:valu

* **LEXICON V_PYZYÖ** pyzyö:pyzy
Front vowel

* **LEXICON V_PYZYÖ-SG3** pyzyö:pyzy

* **LEXICON V_PYZYÖ-3** pyzyö:pyzy

-UO polysyllabic stem

* **LEXICON V_SUALISTUO** sualistuo:sualistu
Back vowel
* **LEXICON V_PEZEVYÖ** sualistuo:sualistu
Front vowel
* **LEXICON V_SUALISTUO/PEZEVYÖ_01** valuo:valu
Gradation Yes
similar_to: V_PYZYÖ

ie

* **LEXICON V_POTKIE** potkie:potki
Back vowel
* **LEXICON V_POTKIE/EČČIE_01** potkie:potki
Gradation No
Ind+Prt+Sg3

* **LEXICON V_POTKIE-SG3** potkie:potki

* **LEXICON V_EČČIE** eččie:ečči
Front vowel

* **LEXICON V_LUGIE** lugie:luge
Back vowel
* **LEXICON V_LUGIE/IMIE_01** lugie:luge
Gradation Yes

* **:%>e INDPRTPL3_ttih ;** 
* **:%>e INDPRSPL3_tAh ;** 

* **LEXICON V_TUNDIE** tundie:tunde 
* **LEXICON V_TUNDIE_01** tundie:tunde 
Gradation Yes
Back vowel

* **:%>e INDPRTPL3_ttih ;** 
* **:%>e INDPRSPL3_tAh ;** 

* **LEXICON V_IMIE** imie:ime
Gradation No
Front vowel

### Verbs ending jA/vA
The verb has only a vowel stem, which may be either weak or strong.

jA/vA monosyllabic stem

* **LEXICON V_JUVVA** juvva:jo
* **LEXICON V_JUVVA_01** juvva:jo

* **LEXICON V_MYVVÄ** myvvä:mö
* **LEXICON V_MYVVÄ_01** myvvä:mö

* **LEXICON V_KÄVVÄ** kävvä:käv

* **LEXICON V_SUAJA** suaja:saa
* **LEXICON V_SUAJA_01** suaja:saa
* **+Inf:%>ja K ;** type 2 also suaha
* **+Inf:%>ha K ;** type 2 also suaha

* **LEXICON V_JIÄJÄ** suaja:saa jiäjä:jää
* **LEXICON V_JIÄJÄ_01** suaja:saa jiäjä:jää
* **+Inf:%>jä K ;** type 2 also jiähä
* **+Inf:%>hä K ;** type 2 also jiähä

* **LEXICON V_VIIJÄ** viijä:ve

* **LEXICON V_PÄITÄ** päitä:päde

* **LEXICON V_VOIJA** voija:voi
* **LEXICON V_VOIJA_01** voija:voi

* **+Inf:%>ja K ;** type 2 also suaha

* **LEXICON V_ROIJA** roija:roi
* **LEXICON V_ROIJA_01** roija:roi
* **+Inf:%>ja K ;** type 2 also suaha

jA polysyllabic stem

* **LEXICON V_SUVAIJA** suvaija:suvai

* **LEXICON V_SUVAIJA-SG3** suvaija:suvai

* **LEXICON V_SUVAIJA-3** suvaija:suvai

* **LEXICON V_EMÄNDÖIJÄ** emändöijä:emändöi

### Verbs ending VtA (-AtA, -OtA, -UtA, -etA,-itA)
The verb has both vowel and consonant stem.

-AtA

* **LEXICON V_ALLATA** allata:alga

gradation: yes

* **LEXICON V_AVATA** avata:ava

gradation: no

* **LEXICON V_BÖVVÄTÄ** bövvätä:böygä

gradation: yes

* **LEXICON V_HYRRÄTÄ** hyrrätä:hyrrä

-etA

* **LEXICON V_RUVETA** ruveta:rube

* **LEXICON V_RUVETA-SG3** ruveta:rube

* **LEXICON V_LANGETA** langeta:lange

* **LEXICON V_ALETA** aleta:ale (alenou)
* **LEXICON V_ALETA_01** aleta:ale (alenou)

* **LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ** vähetä:vähe (vähenöy)
* **LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ_01** vähetä:vähe (vähenöy)

* **LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ-SG3** vähetä:vähe (vähenöy)

-itA

* **LEXICON V_KABLITA** kablita:kabli

* **LEXICON V_REVITÄ** revitä:rebi

* **LEXICON V_HÄVITÄ** hävitä:hävi

* **LEXICON V_KÄITÄ** käitä:käge

* **LEXICON V_MERKITÄ** merkitä:merki
* **LEXICON V_MAINITA** mainita:maini

-OtA

* **LEXICON V_KIKOTA** kikota:kikko

* **LEXICON V_HÖPSÖTÄ** höpsötä:höpsö

* **LEXICON V_ARVOTA** arvota:arvo

-UtA

* **LEXICON V_BAUHUTA** bauhuta:bauhu

* **LEXICON V_BAUHUTA-SG3** bauhuta:bauhu

* **LEXICON V_HÖYRYTÄ** höyrytä:höyry

### Verbs ending nnA, llA, CtA
The verb has both vowel and consonant stem.

two-syllable stem, panna, mennä

* **LEXICON V_TULLA** tulla:tul

* **LEXICON V_KUULTA** kuulta:kuul

* **LEXICON V_KUULTA-SG3** kuulta:kuul

* **LEXICON V_PESTÄ** pestä:pes

* **LEXICON V_VIERTÄ** viertä:vier

* **LEXICON V_NOSTA** nosta:no
* **LEXICON V_NOSTA/XX_01** nosta:no

* **LEXICON V_JUOSTA_BACK** juosta:juoks
* **LEXICON V_JUOSTA_01** juosta:juoks

* **LEXICON V_NÄHTÄ** nähtä:nä
* **LEXICON V_NÄHTÄ_01** nähtä:nä

polysyllable stem, ommella, kävellä, ulista, pölistä

* **LEXICON V_KUVITELLA** kuvitella:kuvittel

* **LEXICON V_EZITELLAE** ezitellä:ezittel

* **LEXICON V_ULISTA** ulista:ulis

* **LEXICON V_PAISTA** paista:pagis
* **LEXICON V_PAISTA_01** paista:pagis

* **LEXICON VR_AMBUO** ambuokseh:ambu
* **LEXICON VR_AMBUO_01** ambuokseh:ambu

* **LEXICON VR_VALUO** valuokseh:valu
* **LEXICON VR_VALUO/PYZYÖ** valuokseh:valu

* **LEXICON VR_PYZYÖ** valuokseh:valu

* **LEXICON VR_PUNUO** punuokseh:puno
* **LEXICON VR_PUNUO/XX_01** punuokseh:puno

* **LEXICON VR_IMIE** imiekseh:ime

* **LEXICON VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01** imiekseh:ime

* **LEXICON VR_POTKIE** potkiekseh:potki

* **LEXICON VR_PIDIÄ** pidiäkseh:pidä
* **LEXICON VR_PIDIÄ_01** pidiäkseh:pidä

* **LEXICON VR_KANDUA** kanduakseh:kanda
* **LEXICON VR_KANDUA_01** kanduakseh:kanda

* **LEXICON VR_KANDUA-SG3** kanduakseh:kanda
* **LEXICON VR_KANDUA-SG3_01** kanduakseh:kanda

* **LEXICON VR_OTTUA** ottuakseh:otta
* **LEXICON VR_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01** ottuakseh:otta

* **LEXICON VR_LIIKUTTUA** kirjuttuakseh:kirjutta
* **LEXICON VR_LIIKUTTUA/XX_01** kirjuttuakseh:kirjutta

* **LEXICON VR_EISTIÄ** eistiäkseh:eistä

Reflexive verbs

* **LEXICON VR_RODIEKSEH** rodiekseh:rodi

* **LEXICON VR_ROIJA** roijakseh:roi

* **LEXICON VR_ROITA** roita:roi 

* **LEXICON VR_JUVVA** juvva:jo
* **LEXICON VR_MYVVÄ** myvvä:mö

* **LEXICON VR_NÄHTÄ** nähtä:nä

* **LEXICON VR_TULLA** tuliekseh:tul !this will need work 2013-10-23

* **LEXICON VR_PESTÄ** tuliekseh:tul !this will need work 2013-10-23

* **LEXICON VR_KUVITELLA** kuvitellakseh:kuvittel !this will need work 2016-08-17

* **LEXICON VR_EBAEILLAE** kuvitellakseh:kuvittel !this will need work 2016-08-17

* **LEXICON VR_AVATA** avatakseh:ava (typätäkseh:typpä)

* **LEXICON VR_SUVAIJA** suvaijakseh:suvai

* **LEXICON VR_EMÄNDÖIJÄ** emändöijäkseh:emändöi

* **LEXICON VR_MAINITA** mainitakseh:maini

V1
This verb type has two final vowels in the first infinitive

V1 3-syllable stem 
This verb type has two final vowels in the first infinitive

* **LEXICON V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr** tulla:tul

* **LEXICON V-VV_KUULLA** kuulla:kuul

* **LEXICON V-VV_VIERRÄ** vierrä:vier

* **LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE** kuvitella:kuvittel

* LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE suvaija:suvai

* LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE emändöijä:emändöi

* LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE mainita:maini

* LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE merkitä:merki

### REFLEXIVE CONJUGATION

HOW WILL THESE WORK

HOW WILL THESE WORK

HOW WILL THESE WORK

## Nonfinites

Forthcoming

## Finites

### INDICATIVE PRESENT

* LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE type 04

### INDICATIVE PRESENT REFLEXIVE

* LEXICON V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE 

### INDICATIVE PRETERITE

### INDICATIVE PRETERITE REFLEXIVE

## Conditional

### CONDITIONAL PRETERITE

* **+Rfl+Pot+Pl3:%>d%{aä%}%>nehes K ;** Shouldn't THIS be the right form

## IMPERATIVE

### IMPERATIVE REFLEXIVE

... and next chapter

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
